Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2228
Area agency on aging; maintain local tax expenditures.

Any area agency on aging receiving state funds pursuant to the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act shall maintain, as a minimum in its area plan budget, the same level of funds expended from local tax sources as was expended in the area plan budget for the year ending June 30, 1981.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 29.